Utah statutes.
39-6-36.   Desertion or absence without leave and other offenses -- Time
limit on trial -- Tolling of time limits.
(1)  A person charged with desertion or absence without leave may be tried and
punished at any time, within four years after the preferral of charges.
(2)  Except under Subsection (1), a person charged with any offense is not
liable to be tried by a military court or punished under Section 39-6-13 if
the offense was committed more than two years before the receipt of sworn
charges and specifications by an officer exercising jurisdiction as a military
court convening authority.
(3)  Periods when the accused was outside the state's jurisdiction to
apprehend him, or when he is in the custody of civilian authorities, are
excluded in computing limitations of time under this section.
